Missouri, session 2026, HB2534.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 161.097 and 168.036, RSMo, are repealed and three new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 161.097, 168.034, and 168.036, to read as
follows:
161.097. 1. The state board of education shall establish standards and procedures by
which it will evaluate all teacher training institutions in this state for the approval of teacher
education programs. The state board of education shall not require teacher training
institutions to meet national or regional accreditation as a part of its standards and procedures
in making those evaluations, but it may accept such accreditations in lieu of such approval if
standards and procedures set thereby are at least as stringent as those set by the board. The
state board of education's standards and procedures for evaluating teacher training institutions
shall equal or exceed those of national or regional accrediting associations.
2. There is hereby established within the department of elementary and secondary
education the "Missouri Advisory Board for Educator Preparation", hereinafter referred to as
"MABEP". The MABEP shall advise the state board of education and the coordinating board
for higher education regarding matters of mutual interest in the area of quality educator
preparation programs in Missouri. The advisory board shall include at least three active
elementary or secondary classroom teachers and at least three faculty members within
approved educator preparation programs. The classroom teacher members shall be selected
to represent various regions of the state and districts of different sizes. The faculty
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2534 2
representatives shall represent institutions from various regions of the state and sizes of
programs. The advisory board shall hold regular meetings that allow members to share needs
and concerns and plan strategies to enhance teacher preparation.
3. Upon approval by the state board of education of the teacher education program at
a particular teacher training institution, any person who graduates from that program, and
who meets other requirements which the state board of education shall prescribe by rule,
regulation and statute shall be granted a certificate or license to teach in the public schools of
this state. However, no such rule or regulation shall require that the program from which the
person graduates be accredited by any national or regional accreditation association.
4. The state board of education shall, in consultation with MABEP, align literacy and
reading instruction coursework for teacher education programs in early childhood,
kindergarten to fifth grade elementary teacher certification, middle school communication
arts, high school communication arts, and all reading and special education certificates to
include the following:
(1) Teacher candidates shall receive classroom and clinical training in:
(a) The core components of reading, including phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency,
comprehension, morphology, syntax, and vocabulary;
(b) Oral and written language development; and
(c) Identification of reading deficiencies, dyslexia, and other language difficulties;
(2) Teacher candidates shall also have training on:
(a) The selection and use of reading curricula and instructional materials;
(b) The administration and interpretation of assessments;
(c) How to translate assessment results into effective practice in the classroom
specific to the needs of students; and
(d) Additional best practices in the field of literacy instruction as recommended by
the literacy advisory council pursuant to section 186.080.
5. The state board of education shall, in consultation with MABEP, ensure that
teacher education programs that receive state aid include at least three credit hours in
social and emotional learning courses and at least three credit hours in social work in
education.
6. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of

HB 2534 3
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2014, shall be invalid
and void.
168.034. 1. For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, the
practicing teacher assistance programs established under section 168.400 shall offer and
include in-service training provided by each local school district for all practicing
teachers in such district for at least three hours regarding social and emotional learning
and at least three hours regarding social work in education.
2. Each school year, all teachers, principals, and licensed educators in each
district shall attend such training or complete training on social and emotional learning
and social work in education through self-review of social and emotional learning
materials and social work in education materials.
3. Attendance at training regarding social and emotional learning and social
work in education shall count as six contact hours of professional development under
section 168.021.
168.036. 1. In addition to granting certificates of license to teach in public schools of
the state under section 168.021, the state board of education shall grant substitute teacher
certificates as provided in this section to any individual seeking to substitute teach in any
public school in this state.
2. (1) The state board shall not grant a certificate of license to teach under this section
to any individual who has not completed a background check as required under section
168.021.
(2) The state board may refuse to issue or renew, suspend, or revoke any certificate
sought or issued under this section in the same manner and for the same reasons as under
section 168.071.
3. The state board may grant a certificate under this section to any individual who has
completed:
(1) At least thirty-six semester hours at an accredited institution of higher education;
or
(2) The twenty-hour online training program required in this section and who
possesses a high school diploma or the equivalent thereof.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and maintain
an online training program for individuals, which shall consist of twenty hours of training
related to subjects appropriate for substitute teachers as determined by the department. The
state board of education shall, in consultation with MABEP, ensure that such training
includes at least three credit hours in social and emotional learning courses and at least
three credit hours in social work in education.

HB 2534 4
5. The state board may grant a certificate under this section to any highly qualified
individual with expertise in a technical or business field or with experience in the Armed
Forces of the United States who has completed the background check required in this section
but does not meet any of the qualifications under subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 3 of this
section if the superintendent of the school district in which the individual seeks to substitute
teach sponsors such individual and the school board of the school district in which the
individual seeks to substitute teach votes to approve such individual to substitute teach.
6. (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions to the contrary, beginning on June 30,
2022, and ending on June 30, 2030, any person who is retired and currently receiving a
retirement allowance under sections 169.010 to 169.141 or sections 169.600 to 169.715, other
than for disability, may be employed to substitute teach on a part-time or temporary substitute
basis by an employer included in the retirement system without a discontinuance of the
person's retirement allowance. Such a person shall not contribute to the retirement system, or
to the public school retirement system established by sections 169.010 to 169.141 or to the
public education employee retirement system established by sections 169.600 to 169.715,
because of earnings during such period of employment.
(2) In addition to the conditions set forth in subdivision 1 of this subsection, any
person retired and currently receiving a retirement allowance under sections 169.010 to
169.141, other than for disability, who is employed by a third party or is performing work as
an independent contractor may be employed to substitute teach on a part-time or temporary
substitute basis, if such person is performing work for an employer included in the retirement
system without a discontinuance of the person's retirement allowance.
(3) If a person is employed pursuant to this subsection on a regular, full-time basis the
person shall not be entitled to receive the person's retirement allowance for any month during
which the person is so employed. The retirement system may require the employer, the third-
party employer, the independent contractor, and the retiree subject to this subsection to
provide documentation showing compliance with this subsection. If such documentation is
not provided, the retirement system may deem the retiree to have exceeded the limitations
provided in this subsection.
7. A certificate granted under this section shall be valid for four years. A certificate
granted under this section shall expire at the end of any calendar year in which the individual
fails to substitute teach for at least five days or forty hours of in-seat instruction.
8. (1) An individual to whom the state board grants a certificate under this section
may be a substitute teacher in a public school in the state if the school district agrees to
employ the individual as a substitute teacher and such individual has completed a background
check as required in subsection 10 of this section.

HB 2534 5
(2) No individual to whom the state board grants a certificate under this section and
who is under twenty years of age shall be a substitute teacher in grades nine to twelve.
9. Each school district may develop an orientation for individuals to whom the state
board grants a certificate under this section for such individuals employed by the school
district and may require such individuals to complete such orientation. Such orientation shall
contain at least two hours of subjects appropriate for substitute teachers and shall contain
instruction on the school district's best practices for classroom management.
10. Beginning January 1, 2023, any substitute teacher may, at the time such substitute
teacher submits the fingerprints and information required for the background check required
under section 168.021, designate up to five school districts to which such substitute teacher
has submitted an application for substitute teaching to receive the results of the substitute
teacher's criminal history background check and fingerprint collection. The total amount of
any fees for disseminating such results to up to five school districts under this subsection shall
not exceed fifty dollars.
11. The state board may exercise the board's authority under chapter 161 to
promulgate all necessary rules and regulations necessary for the administration of this section.
✔